Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.070

State noxious weed control board—Powers—Report.

(1) In addition to the powers conferred on the state noxious weed control board under other provisions of this chapter, it has the power to:

(a) Employ a state noxious weed control board executive secretary and educational specialist, and additional persons as it deems necessary, to disseminate information relating to noxious weeds to county noxious weed control boards and weed districts, to coordinate the educational and weed control efforts of the various county and regional noxious weed control boards and weed districts, and to assist the board in carrying out its responsibilities;

(b) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules, pursuant to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as may be necessary to carry out the duties and authorities assigned to the board by this chapter.

(2) The state noxious weed control board must provide a written report before January 1st of each odd-numbered year to the county noxious weed control boards and the weed districts showing the expenditure of state funds on noxious weed control; specifically how the funds were spent; the status of the state, county, and district programs; and recommendations for the continued best use of state funds for noxious weed control. The report must include recommendations as to the long-term needs regarding weed control.

[ 2021 c 217 s 5; 1998 c 245 s 3; 1997 c 353 s 8; 1987 c 438 s 6; 1975 1st ex.s. c 13 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 113 s 7.]